Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2657.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 38, chapter 8, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 38-1121, to read: START_STATUTE38-1121. Law enforcement agencies; federal agents; immigration; applicability; definition A. Notwithstanding any other law, A law enforcement agency in this state may not enter into, modify or renew an agreement with federal immigration authorities To do either of the following: 1. exercise federal civil immigration authority under 8 UNITED STATES CODE SECTION 1357(g). 2. detain or house individuals who are in the custody of a federal immigration authority for violations of federal immigration law. B. This section does not prohibit a law enforcement AGENCY in this state from enforcing any valid court-issued warrants or orders or from complying with other federal requirements. C. For the purposes of this section, "Law enforcement agency" means a municipal police department, a county sheriff's office, a publicly funded law enforcement department and the department of public safety. END_STATUTE